California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
The commission may make, in its name, contracts to receive or render services in formulating and conducting plans and programs and any other contracts or agreements that the commission deems necessary for carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77095.

The commission may conduct, and contract with others to conduct, research, including the study, analysis, accumulation, and dissemination of information obtained from the research or elsewhere, respecting this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

77096.

The commission may accept contributions of, or match, private, state, or federal funds and employ or make contributions of funds to other persons or state or federal agencies for purposes of maintaining, promoting, and enhancing the walnut industry pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

77097.

The commission may collect information, including, but not limited to, industry crop statistics, and may publish and distribute without charge a bulletin or other communication for dissemination of information to persons subject to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

77098.

The commission shall establish an assessment rate to defray operating costs of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77099.

The commission shall establish an annual budget according to accepted accounting practices. The budget shall be concurred in by the secretary prior to disbursement of funds, except for disbursements made pursuant to Section 77086.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 97.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77100.

The commission shall submit to the secretary, for his or her concurrence, an annual statement of contemplated activities authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 98.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77101.

All lists of producers in the possession of the commission or the secretary are confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required by a court order after a hearing in a judicial proceeding involving this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 99.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77102.

The commission may investigate and prosecute civil violations of this chapter and file complaints with appropriate law enforcement agencies or officers for suspected criminal violations of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Implementation and Voting Procedures [77121. - 77131.]

77121.

(a) The secretary shall establish a list of producers eligible to vote on implementation of this chapter. In establishing the list, the secretary shall require that handlers, producers, and others submit the names and mailing addresses of all producers. The secretary also may require that the information provided include the quantity of walnuts produced by each producer or, in the alternative, may establish procedures for receiving the information at the time of the referendum vote specified in Section 77123. The request for the information shall be in writing. The information shall be filed within 30 days following receipt of the written request.

(b) Any producer whose name does not appear on the secretary’s list may have his or her name placed on the list by filing with the secretary a signed statement identifying himself or herself as a producer. Failure to be on the list does not exempt the producer from paying assessments.

(c) Proponents and opponents of the commission may contact producers on the list in a form and manner prescribed by the secretary so long as all expenses associated with the contacts are paid in advance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 101.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77123.

This chapter, except as necessary to conduct an implementation referendum vote, shall not become operative until the secretary finds in a referendum vote conducted by the secretary that at least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the secretary pursuant to this article participate, and that a majority of the producers voting in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the producers so voting handled a majority of the total quantity of walnuts handled in the preceding marketing year by all those producers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 409, Sec. 18.   Effective September 22, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

77124.

The secretary shall establish a period in which to conduct the referendum that shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days in duration and may prescribe additional procedures necessary to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the secretary may extend the period; however, the total referendum period may not exceed 60 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 103.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77125.

Nonreceipt of a ballot shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77126.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given as provided in Section 77123, the secretary shall so certify and give notice of the favorable vote to all affected producers whose names and addresses are on file with the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 104.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77127.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given as provided in Section 77123, the secretary shall so certify and declare this chapter inoperative. The secretary may conduct another implementation referendum vote one year or more after the previous vote has been taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 105.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77130.

Subsequent to the first election of members of the commission pursuant to this chapter, persons to be elected to the commission shall be selected pursuant to nomination and election procedures which shall be established by the commission with the concurrence of the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 107.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77130.5.

Subsequent to the initial implementation referendum vote and the first election of commissioners, the commission shall establish procedures for the purpose of providing persons subject to this chapter with access to producers on the commission’s list of producers for purposes related to an election or referendum or an act or determination of the commission. Access to producers shall not include actual release or disclosure of the commission’s confidential list of producers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 108.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77131.

(a) Prior to the referendum vote conducted by the secretary pursuant to Section 77123, the proponents of the commission shall deposit with the secretary the amount that the secretary deems necessary to defray the expenses of preparing the necessary lists and information and conducting the vote.

(b) Any funds not used in carrying out Section 77123 shall be returned to the proponents of the commission who deposited the funds with the secretary.

(c) Upon establishment of the commission, the commission may reimburse the proponents of the commission for any funds deposited with the secretary that were used in carrying out Section 77123 and for any legal expenses and costs incurred in establishing the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 109.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assessments and Records [77151. - 77158.]

77151.

(a) The commission shall establish the assessment for the following marketing year not later than the first day of each marketing year or as soon thereafter as is possible.

(b) The assessment shall not exceed one cent ($0.01) per inshell pound on all walnuts shipped by producers to handlers or handled by producers.

(c) Assessments provided for in this section shall be levied on the producer. The handler shall deduct the assessment from amounts paid by him or her to the producer and shall be a trustee of the funds until they are paid to the commission at the time and in the manner prescribed by the commission.

(d) A fee greater than the amount provided for in subdivision (b) may not be charged unless and until a greater fee is approved by producers pursuant to the procedures specified in Section 77123.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 409, Sec. 21.   Effective September 22, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

77152.

This chapter does not apply to the walnuts produced only for the producer’s home use and to producers who handle 2,000 pounds or less of walnuts in the preceding marketing year. However, the producer shall file an affidavit with the commission establishing that he or she has not handled walnuts. The commission shall then determine whether the affidavit should be approved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 409, Sec. 22.   Effective September 22, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

77153.

Every handler shall keep a complete and accurate record of all walnuts handled with the name of the producer whose walnuts were handled. The records shall be in simple form and contain information prescribed by the commission. The records shall be preserved by the handler for a period of two years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written demand of the commission or its duly authorized agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77154.

All proprietary information obtained by the commission or the secretary from producers or handlers is confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required by a court order after a hearing in a judicial proceeding involving this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 110.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77155.

Every handler shall be personally liable for the payment of collected assessments to the commission, and the failure of a handler to collect the assessment from any producer does not exempt any handler from liability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77156.

Any assessment which is levied as provided for in this chapter is a personal debt of every producer so assessed. Failure of a handler to collect the assessment does not relieve the producer of the obligation to pay the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77157.

Any producer or handler who fails to file a return or pay any assessment within the time required by the commission shall pay to the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment determined to be due and, in addition, pay 112 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77158.

When the handler is a corporation, all of the directors and officers of the corporation in their capacity as individuals shall be included, and any liability for failing to collect or make payment of assessments, of which a corporate handler may be subject to under this chapter, shall also include identical liability upon each director and each officer of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Actions and Penalties [77171. - 77174.]

77171.

It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Refuse to render a report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(b) Furnish a false report, statement, or record required by the commission. 

(c) When engaged in the handling of walnuts, fail or refuse to furnish the commission, or its duly authorized agents, information concerning the names and addresses of persons from whom walnuts have been received and the quantity so received.

(d) Secrete, destroy, or alter records required to be kept under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

77172.

The commission shall establish procedures for the purpose of according individuals aggrieved by its actions or determinations an informal hearing before the commission or before a committee of the commission designated for this purpose. Appeals from decisions of the commission may be made to the secretary. The determination of the secretary shall be subject to judicial review upon petition filed with the appropriate superior court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 111.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77173.

(a) The commission may commence civil actions and utilize all remedies provided in law or equity for the collection of assessments and civil penalties and for the obtaining of injunctive relief or specific performance regarding this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. A court shall issue to the commission any requested writ of attachment or injunctive relief upon a prima facie showing by verified complaint that a named defendant has violated this chapter or any other rule or regulation of the commission, including, but not limited to, the nonpayment of assessments. No bond shall be required to be posted by the commission as a condition for the issuance of any writ of attachment or injunction relief.

(b) A writ of attachment shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing specified in Section 485.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure is not required. Injunctive relief shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing of irreparable harm or inadequate remedy at law specified in Sections 526 and 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure is not required.

(c) Upon entry of any final judgment on behalf of the commission against any defendant, the court shall enjoin the defendant from conducting any type of business regarding walnuts until there is full compliance and satisfaction of the judgment. Upon a favorable judgment for the commission, it shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for any reasonable attorney’s fees and other actual related costs. Venue for these actions may be established at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 868, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

77174.

Termination of this chapter shall not affect or waive any right, duty, obligation, or liability which shall have arisen or which may thereafter arise in connection with this chapter, release or extinguish any violation of this chapter, or affect or impair any right or remedies of the commission with respect to any violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Continuation or Suspension and Termination [77191. - 77195.]

77191.

This chapter shall become inoperative at the end of any marketing year in which targeted export assistance funds provided by the federal government have been permanently terminated, unless, pursuant to the procedures described in Section 77193, the producers approve the continuation of the commission. Funds are permanently terminated within the meaning of the previous sentence when the federal government does not provide targeted export assistance funds in three consecutive budget years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 323, Sec. 16.   (AB 2682)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

77192.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 77191, the secretary shall terminate the commission at the end of the then current marketing year in accordance with Sections 77194 and 77195 if the secretary finds that the termination of the commission is requested in writing, within a 90-day period, by at least 51 percent of the eligible producers that produce at least 51 percent of the total volume of walnuts.

(b) The person or persons originating the request shall file a written notice with the secretary in a manner that establishes the date the request is initiated. Any person may withdraw his or her name from the petition requesting the termination prior to the time the request is presented to the secretary.

(c) The signatures on the petition requesting the termination need not all be appended to one sheet of paper. Each person signing the petition shall specify his or her place of business in a manner that will enable the location to be readily ascertained.

(d) The petition shall bear a copy of the notice of intention to terminate. Signatures shall be secured within the time limit specified in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 112.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77193.

(a) Every six years, beginning in the 1992–93 marketing year, the secretary shall hold a hearing to determine whether operation of this chapter should be continued. If the secretary finds after the hearing that a substantial question exists among the producers assessed under this chapter regarding whether operation of this chapter should be continued, the secretary shall cause a referendum vote to be conducted among producers. If a referendum is required, the operation of this chapter shall continue if the secretary finds that a majority of producers voting in the referendum voted in favor of the continuation of this chapter, and those so voting handled a majority of the total quantity of walnuts handled in the preceding marketing years by all such producers voting in the referendum.

(b) If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given, the secretary shall so certify and this chapter shall remain in operation. If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given, the secretary shall so certify and declare the operation of this chapter suspended upon expiration of the then current marketing year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 409, Sec. 23.   Effective September 22, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

77194.

After the effective date of suspension of the operation of this chapter, the operation of the commission shall be concluded and any and all funds remaining held by the commission and not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating operations of the commission, shall be returned upon a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding marketing year. However, if the commission finds that the amounts so returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the prorate refund to these persons, any funds remaining after payment of all expenses of winding up and terminating operations shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid into an appropriate program conducted by the University of California or the California State University, another state agency, or a federal agency which deals with the purposes of this chapter. If no program exists, the funds shall be paid into the State Treasury as unclaimed trust funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 160, Sec. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

77195.

Upon suspension of the operation of this chapter, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to all producers affected by the suspension whose names and addresses are on file.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.   Effective April 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 17. California Pepper Commission [77201. - 77376.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration and General Provisions [77201. - 77207.]

77201.

The production and marketing of peppers constitute an important industry of this state which not only provides substantial and necessary revenues for the state and employment for its citizens, but also furnishes essential food vital to the public health and welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77202.

The maintenance of the pepper industry of California is necessary to assure the consuming public of a continuous supply of this vital food and the maintenance of needed levels of income for those engaged in the industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77203.

The production and marketing of peppers produced in this state is hereby declared to be affected with a public interest. This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77204.

No action taken by the commission, nor by any individual in accordance with this chapter or with the rules and regulations adopted under this chapter, is a violation of the so-called Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Fair Trade Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16900) of that Part 2), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1700) of that Part 2), or any statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77205.

This chapter shall be liberally construed. If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held to be invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77206.

It is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination that members of the commission are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular agricultural industry concerned and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are elected or appointed to the commission, the particular agricultural industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77207.

A commission form of administration created by this chapter is designed to deal with the broad field of production research.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [77221. - 77231.]

77221.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77222.

“Pepper” means all types of fruit grown in California from the plant family Solanaceae, Genus Capsicum, including seed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77223.

“Books and records” means books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77224.

“Commission” means the California Pepper Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77225.

(a) The commission shall be composed of five districts. The boundaries of each district shall be established by a two-thirds vote of the full commission, that is concurred in by the secretary. District boundaries shall be established to reflect similar total production among the districts in order to ensure proper representation by producers. These boundaries need not coincide with county lines.

(b) The boundaries of any district may be changed by a two-thirds vote of the full commission, that is concurred in by the secretary, when necessary to maintain similar total production among the districts and to ensure proper representation by producers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77226.

(a) “Handler” means any person engaged in marketing of peppers which the person has produced, purchased, or acquired from a producer, or is marketing on behalf of a producer whether as owner, agent, employee, broker, or otherwise. “Handler” does not include any person who handles less than 100 tons of fresh peppers, or the equivalent in dehydrated peppers or pepper seed, in a marketing year.

(b) “Handle” means to engage in the business of a handler.

(c) The tonnage threshold specified in subdivision (a) may be increased by a two-thirds vote of the commission.

(d) The tonnage threshold specified in subdivision (a) may be decreased only if approved by referendum pursuant to Sections 77311 to 77316, inclusive. For purposes of a referendum conducted pursuant to this subdivision, the terms “producer” and “handler” in Section 77311 to 77316, inclusive, includes persons who would become subject to this chapter if the referendum is approved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77227.

“Market” or “marketing” means to sell peppers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77228.

“Production research” means any cultural and biological research relating to field production of peppers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77229.

“Marketing year” or “fiscal year” means the period beginning March 1 of any year and extending through the last day of February of the next year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77230.

(a) “Producer” means any person in this state who grows peppers for market and who, upon request, provides proof of commodity sale. “Producer” does not include any person who grows less than 10 acres of peppers, or produces less than 100 tons of fresh peppers, or the equivalent in dry peppers or pepper seed, in the current marketing year.

(b) The acreage and tonnage thresholds specified in subdivision (a) may be decreased only if approved by referendum pursuant to Section 77311 to 77316, inclusive. For purposes of a referendum conducted pursuant to this subdivision, the terms “producer” and “handler” in Sections 77311 to 77316, inclusive, include persons who would become subject to this chapter if the referendum is approved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77231.

“Ex officio member” means a nonvoting member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The California Pepper Commission [77251. - 77268.]

77251.

(a) There is in the state government the California Pepper Commission. The commission shall be composed of five pepper producers, five pepper handlers, one public member, and may include two at-large members at the discretion of the commission.

(b) Five producers, one from each district, shall be elected by and from producers within the respective districts. Five handlers, representing the major categories of pepper handling as determined by the commission, shall be elected by and from other qualified handlers engaged in the same activity. The determination of what the major categories of pepper handling activities are, and any subsequent change to the categories shall be made by a two-thirds vote of the full commission that is concurred in by the secretary.

(c) The public member shall be appointed to the commission by the secretary from nominees recommended by the commission.

(d) Two at-large members may be elected by the producers and handlers on the commission from among individuals who have a financial interest in the California pepper industry but who are not necessarily producers or handlers as defined in this article.

(e) The secretary and other appropriate individuals as determined by the commission shall be ex officio members of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77252.

(a) The secretary may require the commission to correct or cease any existing activity or function that is determined by the secretary not to be in the public interest or that is in violation of this chapter.

(b) If the commission refuses or fails to cease these activities or functions or to make corrections required by the secretary, the secretary may, upon written notice, suspend all or a portion of the activities or functions of the commission until the time that the cessation or correction of activities or functions as required by the secretary has been accomplished by the commission.

(c) Actions of the commission in violation of the written notice are without legal force or effect. The secretary, to the extent feasible, shall issue the written notice prior to the commission entering into any contractual relationship affecting the existing or proposed activities or functions that are the subject of the written notice.

(d) Upon service of the written notice, the secretary shall notify the commission in writing of the specific acts that the secretary determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter, the secretary’s reasons for requiring a cessation or correction of specific existing or proposed activities or functions, and the secretary’s recommendations as to what will make the activities or functions acceptable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 5.1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77253.

The commission or the secretary may bring an action for judicial relief from the secretary’s written notice, or from noncompliance by the commission with the written notice, as the case may be, in a court of competent jurisdiction, which may issue a temporary restraining order, permanent injunction, or other applicable relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 68.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

77254.

When the secretary is required to concur in a decision of the commission, the secretary shall give his or her response to the commission within 15 working days from notification of the decision. The response may be a request that additional information be provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 5.3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77255.

The commission shall reimburse the secretary for all expenditures incurred by the secretary in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities pursuant to this chapter. However, a court may, if it finds that the secretary acted arbitrarily or capriciously in restricting the activities or functions of the commission, relieve the commission of the responsibility for payment of the secretary’s legal costs with regard to that action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 5.4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77256.

Each member of the commission, except ex officio members, shall have an alternate member to be elected in the same manner as the member. Except as provided in Section 77264, an alternate member shall, in the absence of the member for whom he or she is an alternate, serve in place of the member and shall have and be able to exercise all the rights, privileges, and powers of the member when serving on the commission. In the event of a change in status making a member ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, resignation, or disqualification of a member, the alternate member shall act as a member on the commission until a qualified successor is elected or appointed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77257.

Any vacancy on the commission occurring by the failure of any person elected to the commission as a member or alternate member to continue in his or her position due to a change in status making the person ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, or resignation, shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term by a majority vote of the remaining members of the commission. That person shall fulfill all the qualifications set forth in this article as required for the member whose office he or she is to fill.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77258.

Any vacancy on the commission occurring by the failure of the public member or alternate member to continue in his or her position due to a change in status making the member ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, resignation, or disqualification, shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term by the secretary from nominees recommended by the commission. That person shall fulfill all the qualifications set forth in this article as required for the member whose office he or she is to fill.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 5.5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77259.

Any producer member and his or her alternate member on the commission shall be an individual producer or an employee representing a producer who has a financial interest in producing, or causing to be produced, peppers for market. Qualifications of producer members and their alternate members shall be maintained during their entire term of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77260.

Any handler member and his or her alternate member on the commission shall have a financial interest in handling peppers for market, or be an employee of a firm which handles peppers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 527, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

77260.5.

Any at-large member elected to the commission, and his or her alternate shall have a financial interest in the California pepper industry and shall have all the rights and privileges of any other member or alternate member, respectively, of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77261.

The public member and his or her alternate member on the commission shall have all the powers, rights, and privileges of any other member or alternate member, respectively, on the commission. The public member and his or her alternate member shall not have any financial interest in the pepper industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77262.

The term of office of all members and alternate members of the commission, except ex officio members, shall be three years, beginning on the first day of February following his or her election and until qualified successors are elected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77263.

The commission shall be and is hereby declared and created a corporate body. It shall have the power to sue and be sued, to contract and be contracted with, and to have and possess all of the powers of a corporation. It may adopt a corporate seal. Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts when authenticated, shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   Effective July 14, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

77264.

A quorum of the commission shall be seven voting members of the commission. An alternate producer or handler member, respectively, may serve in the absence of a member if the member’s alternate is absent and the action is necessary to establish a quorum. Unless specified otherwise in this chapter, the vote of a majority of members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum shall constitute the act of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 167, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

77265.

The secretary or his or her representative shall be notified and may attend each meeting of the commission and any committee meeting of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

77266.
